Idaho, session 2025, H0045.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-2303A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-2303A. FLAGS -- PROPER PROTOCOL. (1) As used in this section, "gov-
ernmental entity" means the state of Idaho or any county, municipality, spe-
cial district, or any other political subdivision or governmental instru-
mentality of or within the state.
(2) A governmental entity shall not display a flag on its property other
than the following:
(a) The United States flag;
(b) The official flag of a governmental entity as defined in this sec-
tion;
(c) Official flags of any state in the United States;
(d) Official flags of any of the military branches and units of the
United States;
(e) The POW/MIA flag as provided for in section 67-2303, Idaho Code; and
(f) Official flags of Indian tribes.
(3) The division of veterans services is hereby authorized to promul-
gate rules directing the proper protocol for the location and display of
flags flown on state property.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.